src/morphology/yrk-all.lexc
LEXICON noperiod
км² ab-nodot-noun ;
км ab-nodot-noun ;
см ab-nodot-noun ;
гг ab-nodot-noun ;
м3/с ab-nodot-noun ;
кв  ab-nodot-noun ;

! =============================================== !
!            Intransitive abbreviations           !
! =============================================== !

! These give clause boundaries before capital letters
! and numbers, but not elsewhere.
! Vi bor i Sth. CLB 10 av oss er innflyttere.
! Vi bor i Sth. CLB Saara er også innflytter.
! Vi vet at Sth. er en fin by.


LEXICON ITRAB


в ab ;
г ab ;
гг ab ;


! =============================================== !
!    Transitive number-related abbreviations      !
! =============================================== !

! These ones are transitive when followed by numbers or
! singleton letters, and intransitive elsewhere.
! Gården har Gnr. 10.
! Gården har Gnr. 5. a.
! Alle gårder har ikke Gnr. CLB Det er et problem.
! Alle gårder har ikke Gnr. og det er et problem.

LEXICON TRNUMAB

Apd		ab-dot ;                                      !
Вып ab-dot ;


! =============================================== !
!              Transitive abbreviations           !
! =============================================== !

LEXICON Acronym
acros ;
< А|Б|В|Г|Д|Е|Ж|З|И|Й|К|Л|М|Н|О|П|Р|С|Т|У|Ф|Х|Ц|Ч|Ш|Щ|Ъ|Ы|Ь|Э|Ю|Я|Ё|І|Ӧ > acr2 ;

LEXICON acr2
< А|Б|В|Г|Д|Е|Ж|З|И|Й|К|Л|М|Н|О|П|Р|С|Т|У|Ф|Х|Ц|Ч|Ш|Щ|Ъ|Ы|Ь|Э|Ю|Я|Ё|І|Ӧ > acr3 ;

LEXICON acr3
< А|Б|В|Г|Д|Е|Ж|З|И|Й|К|Л|М|Н|О|П|Р|С|Т|У|Ф|Х|Ц|Ч|Ш|Щ|Ъ|Ы|Ь|Э|Ю|Я|Ё|І|Ӧ > acr4 ;
acrotag ;

LEXICON acr4
< А|Б|В|Г|Д|Е|Ж|З|И|Й|К|Л|М|Н|О|П|Р|С|Т|У|Ф|Х|Ц|Ч|Ш|Щ|Ъ|Ы|Ь|Э|Ю|Я|Ё|І|Ӧ > acr5 ;
acrotag ;

LEXICON acr5
< А|Б|В|Г|Д|Е|Ж|З|И|Й|К|Л|М|Н|О|П|Р|С|Т|У|Ф|Х|Ц|Ч|Ш|Щ|Ъ|Ы|Ь|Э|Ю|Я|Ё|І|Ӧ > acrotag ;
acrotag ;

LEXICON acrotag
+N+ACR: ACRONDELIMITER ;

LEXICON acros
см³ acrotag ;
°C acrotag ;
K acrotag ; ! Kelvin, Latin letter K

LEXICON Punctuation 
+CLB:%,   # ;
+CLB:%.   # ;
+CLB:%:   # ;
+CLB:%;	  # ;
+CLB:%!	  # ;
+CLB:%?	  # ;
+PUNCT:%-  # ;
+HYPH:%" # ;
+HYPH:%« # ;
+HYPH:%» # ;
+PAR:%[ # ;
+PAR:%] # ;
+PAR:%( # ;
+PAR:%) # ;


!! Adposition inflection
!! ---------------
!! Nenets adpositions inflect in person (and some in local cases).

LEXICON POSTP_ABS
+Po+Abs: K ;
POSTP_VOW ;

LEXICON POSTP_VOW
+Po: AFTER-OBLIQUE-SG-POSSESSA-COME-POSSESSOR-INDICES ;
!+Po+PxSg1: н ;
!+Po+PxSg2: нд ;
!+Po+PxSg3: нда ;
!+Po+PxDu1: ниʼ ;
!+Po+PxDu2: ндиʼ ;
!+Po+PxDu3: ндиʼ ;
!+Po+PxPl1: наˮ ;
!+Po+PxPl2: даˮ ;
!+Po+PxPl3: ндоʼ ;

LEXICON POSTP_DAT
+Po+Dat:ʼ K ;
:а POSTP_VOW ;

LEXICON POSTP_LOC
+Po+Loc:на K ;
+Po+Loc:на AFTER-OBLIQUE-SG-POSSESSA-COME-POSSESSOR-INDICES ;

!+Po+PxSg1: нан ;
!+Po+PxSg1: нани ;
!+Po+PxSg2: нанд ;
!+Po+PxSg3: нанда ;
!+Po+PxDu1: наниʼ ;
!+Po+PxDu2: нандиʼ ;
!+Po+PxDu3: нандиʼ ;
!+Po+PxPl1: нанаˮ ;
!+Po+PxPl2: нандаˮ ;
!+Po+PxPl3: нандоʼ ;

LEXICON POSTP_LOC-Pal/Var
+Po+Loc:ня K ;
+Po+Loc:ня AFTER-OBLIQUE-SG-POSSESSA-COME-POSSESSOR-INDICES ;
!+Po+PxSg1: нян ;
!+Po+PxSg2: нянд ;
!+Po+PxSg3: нянда ;
!+Po+PxDu1: няниʼ ;
!+Po+PxDu2: няндиʼ ;
!+Po+PxDu3: няндиʼ ;
!+Po+PxPl1: нянаˮ ;
!+Po+PxPl2: няндаˮ ;
!+Po+PxPl3: няндоʼ ;

LEXICON POSTP_ABL
+Po+Abl:д K ;
+Po+Abl:да AFTER-OBLIQUE-SG-POSSESSA-COME-POSSESSOR-INDICES ;
!+Po+PxSg1: дан ;
!+Po+PxSg2: данд ;
!+Po+PxSg3: данда ;
!+Po+PxDu1: даниʼ ;
!+Po+PxDu2: дандиʼ ;
!+Po+PxDu3: дандиʼ ;
!+Po+PxPl1: данаˮ ;
!+Po+PxPl2: дандаˮ ;
!+Po+PxPl3: дандоʼ ;

LEXICON POSTP_PROS
+Po+Pros:мна K ;
+Po+Pros:мна AFTER-OBLIQUE-SG-POSSESSA-COME-POSSESSOR-INDICES ;
!+Po+PxSg1: мнан ;
!+Po+PxSg2: мнанд ;
!+Po+PxSg3: мнанда ;
!+Po+PxDu1: мнаниʼ ;
!+Po+PxDu2: мнандиʼ ;
!+Po+PxDu3: мнандиʼ ;
!+Po+PxPl1: мнанаˮ ;
!+Po+PxPl2: мнандаˮ ;
!+Po+PxPl3: мнандоʼ ;

LEXICON POSTP_PROS-Pal/Var
+Po+Pros:мня K ;
+Po+Pros:мня AFTER-OBLIQUE-SG-POSSESSA-COME-POSSESSOR-INDICES ;

!+Po+PxSg1: мнян ;
!+Po+PxSg2: мнянд ;
!+Po+PxSg3: мнянда ;
!+Po+PxDu1: мняниʼ ;
!+Po+PxDu2: мняндиʼ ;
!+Po+PxDu3: мняндиʼ ;
!+Po+PxPl1: мнянаˮ ;
!+Po+PxPl2: мняндаˮ ;
!+Po+PxPl3: мняндоʼ ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:

!! Adjective inflection
!! --------------------
!! Nenets ?? adjectives compare.

!!LEXICON Comparisons
!!+A+pos:0        Cases   ;
!!+A+cmp:er       Cases   ;
!!+A+sup:est      Cases   ;

LEXICON A_ӇЭ !!= @CODE@ ӈэ:ӈэ 1  
+A:  SGNOMSUF ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_ӇЭ ;

LEXICON A_ПАНЫ  !!= @CODE@ пӑны:пӑны 9 
+A:  SGNOMSUF ;
+A+Der/MWN: NMN_ПАНЫ ;

LEXICON A_ХУСУВЭЙ  !!= @CODE@ хусувэй: 10 !!ProsSg -ювна
+A: SGNOMSUF ;
+A+Der/MWN: NMN_ХУСУВЭЙ ;

LEXICON A_ЕД/ХУСУВЭЙ
+A: SGNOMSUF ;
+A+Der/MWN: NMN_ЕД/ХУСУВЭЙ ;

LEXICON A_ХАНО  !!= @CODE@ хӑн: 11 !!ProsSg -увна
!! [total=27]
!! хӑн xən°    хӑнӑн’ xənən°h        хӑн” xən°q     хӑно xəno
+A: SGNOMSUF ;
+A+Der/MWN: NMN_ХАНО ;

LEXICON A_ЕД !!= @CODE@ ед: 13 !!ProsSg -увна /-ювна
+A: SGNOMSUF ;
+A+Der/MWN: NMN_ЕД ;

LEXICON A_ӇУДИ  !!= @CODE@ ӈуда: 15 !!ProsSg -вна
+A: SGNOMSUF ;
+A+Der/MWN: NMN_ӇУДИ ;

LEXICON A_ӇОДИ  !!= @CODE@ ӈодя: 17 !!ProsSg -вна
+A: SGNOMSUF ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_ӇОДИ ;

LEXICON A_ӇОДИ/ТЁН
!!
+A: SGNOMSUF ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_ӇОДИ/ТЁН ;

LEXICON A_МАРАӇГЫ !!
!!
+A: SGNOMSUF ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_МАРАӇГЫ ;

LEXICON A_ХОБ  !!= @CODE@ хоба: 19 !!ProsSg -вна
+A: SGNOMSUF ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_ХОБ ;

LEXICON A_МАРАӇГЫ/ХОБ !!
!!
+A: SGNOMSUF ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_МАРАӇГЫ/ХОБ ;

LEXICON A_ТЁН  !!= @CODE@ тёня: 20 !!ProsSg -вна
+A: SGNOMSUF ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_ТЁН ;

LEXICON A_ПИСЬ  !!= @CODE@ пися: 21 !!ProsSg -вна
+A: SGNOMSUF ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_ПИСЬ ;

LEXICON A_ӇАНУ  !!= @CODE@ ӈӑно: 23 !!ProsSg -вна
!! [total=57]
!! ңӑно ŋəno   ңӑнон’ ŋənon°h ңӑно” ŋənoq    ңӑну ŋənu
+A: SGNOMSUF ;
+A+Der/MWN: NMN_ӇАНУ ;

LEXICON A_ӇУВО  !!= @CODE@ ӈумʼ:ӈум 25 !!ProsSg -(м)на
!! ңум’ ŋum     ңумд’ ŋumt°h    ңув” ŋuw°q      ңуво ŋuwo
+A:ʼ SGNOMSUF ;
+A+Der/MWN: NMN_ӇУВО ;


LEXICON A_НЮБЕ-Pal/Var  !!= @CODE@ нюмʼ:нюм 26
!! нюм’ nyum    нюмд’ nyumt°h   нюв” nyuw°q     нюбе nyubye
+A:ʼ SGNOMSUF ;
+A+Der/MWN: NMN_НЮБЕ ;

LEXICON A_МЕРЁ !! Check this
+A: SGNOMSUF ;
+A+Der/MWN: NMN_ӇАНУ ;

LEXICON A_ВАР
! варˮ:вар
 A_МЯДО ;

LEXICON A_МЯДО  !!= @CODE@ мяˮ:мя 35   !!ProsSg -мна
+A:Д1 SGNOMSUF ;
+A+Der/MWN: NMN_МЯДО ;

LEXICON A_САБЦЬ  !!= @CODE@ сабць:сабць!!= @CODE@ тир: 12 !!ProsSg -увна
!! What makes this different from N_ТИРЕ?
+A: SGNOMSUF ;
+A+Der/MWN: NMN_ТИРЕ ;


!!This has to be split into various sublexcons.
LEXICON A_Cons
+A: SGNOMSUF ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_Cons ;

!!This has to be split into various sublexcons.
LEXICON A_Vow
+A: SGNOMSUF ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_Vow ;


! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:

!! Adverbs
!! --------------------
!! Nenets adverbs...


 
LEXICON ADV_
+Adv: # ; 

LEXICON ADV-LOC_
+Adv+Loc: # ;

LEXICON ADV-TEMP_
+Adv+Temp: # ;

LEXICON ADV-MANNER_
+Adv+Manner: # ;



! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:

!! Clitics inflection
!! --------------------
!! Nenets clitics...



LEXICON K
!+Qst:а # ;
#; 



! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:

!! Descriptives
!! --------------------
!! Nenets descriptives...


 
LEXICON DESCR_
+Descr: # ; 



! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:

!! Interjections
!! --------------------
!! Nenets interjections...


 
LEXICON INTERJ_
+Interj: # ; 



! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:

!! Noun inflection
!! ---------------

!! Nenets nouns inflect in cases.


LEXICON N_ӇЭ  !!= @CODE@ ӈэ:ӈэ 1  ProsSg -вна
!! no change in stem
!! ңэ ŋæ     ңэн’ ŋæn°h	ңэ” ŋæq	ңэ ŋæ
!! Yaml: __xo__
+N: NMN_ӇЭ ;
+N+Pl+Pros:%>ˮ%{ауоэиыØ%}%{увм%}н%{ая%}	K ; !2013-10-22
+N+Sg+Pros:%>%{ауоэиыØ%}%{увм%}А2н%{ая%}	K ; !2013-10-22
+N: POSSESSA-PL-PROS_ˮмана ;

LEXICON N_ӇЭ-RUS 
+Rus: N_ӇЭ ;

LEXICON N_ӇЭ-Pal/Var  !!= @CODE@ ӈэ:ӈэ 1  ProsSg -вна
!! no change in stem
!! ңэ ŋæ     ңэн’ ŋæn°h	ңэ” ŋæq	ңэ ŋæ
+N+Pl+Pros:%>ˮ%{ауоэиыØ%}%{увм%}н%{ая%}	K ; !2013-10-22
+N+Sg+Pros:%>%{ауоэиыØ%}%{увм%}А2н%{ая%}	K ; !2013-10-22
+N: NMN_ӇЭ ;

LEXICON N_ӇЭ/ХАБИЕ  !!= @CODE@ ӈэ:ӈэ 1  ProsSg -вна
 !!= @CODE@ хӑби:8 ProsSg -вна
+N: NMN_ӇЭ ;
+N: PLACCSUF_Е ; 

LEXICON N_Ё  !!= @CODE@ я:я 2 ProsSg -вна
!! Yaml: __ya__
!! /total=3/
!! я ya	ян’ yan°h	я” yaq	ё yo
+N: NMN_Ё ;

LEXICON N_ӇЭ/Ё !! та:та 
!!= @CODE@ ӈэ:ӈэ 1  ProsSg -вна
!!= @CODE@ я:я 2 ProsSg -вна
+N: NMN_ӇЭ/Ё ;

LEXICON adjectives
вадисей:вадисей A_САБЦЬ  "vasen" ;
вэва:вэва A_ХОБ  "huono" ;
вэнзу:вэнзу A_ӇЭ  "ilkeä" ;
иӈгденя:иӈгденя A_ӇОДИ  "kunnioitettu" ;
лакамбухы:лакамбухы A_ПАНЫ  "tilapäinen" ;
лата:лата A_ХОБ  "leveä" ;
лимбика:лимбика A_МАРАӇГЫ  "pehmeä ja lämmin" ;
лэмда:лэмда A_ӇУДИ  "jäntevä" ;
лядхэй:лядхэй A_ЕД/ХУСУВЭЙ  "rako" ;
малк:малк A_ХАНО  "sarveton" ;
маноӈуй:маноӈуй A_ЕД  "sidottu" ;
махадабэй:махадабэй A_ХУСУВЭЙ  "kovettunut" ;
маябцо:маябцо A_ӇАНУ  "iloinen" ;
молорˮ:молор A_ВАР  "pilvinen" ;
мурхэй:мурхэй A_ЕД/ХУСУВЭЙ  "säröinen" ;
наӈэдя:наӈэдя A_ӇОДИ  "täys-" ;
нензелˮ:нензел A_ВАР  "yksinkertainen" ;
нерняӈы:нерняӈы A_ПАНЫ  "etumainen" ;
нюкля:нюкля A_ӇОДИ  "iso" ;
няби:няби A_ӇЭ  "toinen" ;
няраӈгой:няраӈгой A_ЕД  "punatukkainen" ;
нярк:нярк A_ХАНО  "punatukkainen" ;
няро:няро A_ӇАНУ  "puhdas" ;
падяраха:падяраха A_МАРАӇГЫ  "sapinvärinen" ;
пальˮ:паль A_МЯДО  "tiheä" ;
парё:парё A_МЕРЁ  "huolekas" ;
пирця:пирця A_ПИСЬ  "korkea" ;
поё:поё A_МЕРЁ  "tiivis" ;
пудана:пудана A_ӇУДИ  "viimeinen" ;
пусэй:пусэй A_ЕД/ХУСУВЭЙ  "viimeinen" ;
пык:пык A_ХАНО  "ahdas" ;
пэдабэй:пэдабэй A_ХУСУВЭЙ  "väsynyt" ;
пярв:пярв A_ХАНО  "tosi kova" ;
сенз:сенз A_ЕД  "terve" ;
сибя:сибя A_ӇОДИ  "kevyt" ;
сэрˮ:сэр A_ВАР  "valkoinen" ;
сянэрцялаха:сянэрцялаха A_МАРАӇГЫ  "šakkilaudan tapainen" ;
тасехэй:тасехэй A_ЕД/ХУСУВЭЙ  "keltainen" ;
тецьда:тецьда A_ӇУДИ  "kylmä" ;
торанэй:торанэй A_ХУСУВЭЙ  "lyhytkarvainen" ;
тыя:тыя A_ПИСЬ  "kapea" ;
тэри:тэри A_ӇЭ  "tavallinen" ;
тябюбцо:тябюбцо A_ӇАНУ  "ikävä" ;
тёмбё:тёмбё A_МЕРЁ  "tarkka" ;
тёняӈы:тёняӈы A_ПАНЫ  "naapuri-" ;
халкадёй:халкадёй A_ЕД  "pitkänomainen" ;
хасерˮ:хасер A_ВАР  "rauhallinen" ;
хырпэй:хырпэй A_ХУСУВЭЙ  "harmaantunut" ;
хэˮнё:хэˮнё A_МЕРЁ  "tyyni" ;
хэмʼ:хэм A_ӇУВО  "lyhyt" ;
ябти:ябти A_ӇЭ  "kova" ;
яена:яена A_ӇУДИ  "sakkainen" ;
яра:яра A_ХОБ  "hiekkainen" ;
ёря:ёря A_ӇОДИ/ТЁН  "syvä" ;
ӈадибцо:ӈадябцо A_ӇАНУ  "hyvin näkyvä" ;
ӈамдэˮлаха:ӈамдэˮлаха A_МАРАӇГЫ  "vihreä" ;
ӈарка:ӈарка A_МАРАӇГЫ/ХОБ  "iso" ;
ӈаць:ӈаць A_САБЦЬ  "nuori" ;
ӈока:ӈока A_ХОБ  "runsas" ;
ӈэли:ӈэли A_ӇЭ  "toinen" ;
ӈэсыхы:ӈэсыхы A_ПАНЫ  "kylä-" ;
LEXICON adpositions
еˮня:еˮ POSTP_LOC-Pal/Var  "kohdalla" ;
ёльцьмана:ёльцьма POSTP_LOC  "asti" ;
ирмня:ир POSTP_PROS-Pal/Var  "vieressä" ;
ирня:ир POSTP_LOC-Pal/Var  "vieressä" ;
мальӈгана:мальӈга POSTP_LOC  "aikana" ;
мюд:мю POSTP_ABL  "sisälta" ;
мюмня:мю POSTP_PROS-Pal/Var  "sisäkautta" ;
мюня:мю POSTP_LOC-Pal/Var  "sisällä" ;
мянʼ:мян POSTP_DAT  "mukaan" ;
нерня:нер POSTP_LOC-Pal/Var  "edessä" ;
нерцюмня:нерцю POSTP_PROS-Pal/Var  "editse" ;
нерʼ:нер POSTP_DAT  "eteen" ;
нид:ни POSTP_ABL  "päältä" ;
ниня:ни POSTP_LOC-Pal/Var  "päällä" ;
някуд:няку POSTP_ABL  "luota" ;
нямна:ня POSTP_PROS  "kautta" ;
нярпойʼ:нярпой POSTP_DAT  "poikki" ;
няюмна:няю POSTP_PROS  "kautta" ;
няюна:няюна POSTP_LOC  "suunnassa" ;
ӈылад:ӈыла POSTP_ABL  "alta" ;
пумна:пу POSTP_PROS  "jälkeen" ;
пуняд:пуня POSTP_ABL  "takaa" ;
пуняна:пуня POSTP_LOC  "takana" ;
пуняʼ:пуня POSTP_DAT  "takaisin" ;
сермня:сер POSTP_PROS-Pal/Var  "aiheesta" ;
тяхана:тяха POSTP_LOC  "takana" ;
хавна:хавна POSTP_ABS  "paitsi" ;
хэвувна:хэву POSTP_PROS  "ohi" ;
ямбанʼ:ямбан POSTP_DAT  "aikana" ;
LEXICON adverbs
мад:мад ADV-MANNER_  "-han/-hän" ;
нюкута:нюкута ADV-MANNER_  "hellästi" ;
ӈахат:ӈахат ADV-LOC_  "kaukaa" ;
ӈобкад:ӈобкад ADV-TEMP_  "usein" ;
пиркана:пиркана ADV-TEMP_  "kuluttua" ;
сидяӈэ:сидяӈэ ADV-MANNER_  "kaksin" ;
тальняʼ:тальняʼ ADV-LOC_  "tänne" ;
тандаяриʼ:тандаяриʼ ADV-TEMP_  "juuri" ;
тикавна:тикавна ADV-LOC_  "sitäkautta" ;
хуняна:хуняна ADV-TEMP_  "huomenna" ;
хуримна:хуримна ADV-LOC_  "kaikkiaalla" ;
яˮавла:яˮавла ADV-MANNER_  "kerkeästi" ;
LEXICON nouns
наны:наны N_ӇЭ  "poika" ;
ню:ню N_ӇЭ-Pal/Var  "poika" ;
партия:партия N_ӇЭ-RUS  "puolue" ;
пи:пи N_ӇЭ-Pal/Var  "yö" ;
пирци:пирци N_ӇЭ  "linnun maha" ;
радио:радио N_ӇЭ-RUS  "radio" ;
са:са N_Ё  "vetohihna" ;
си:си N_ӇЭ-Pal/Var  "reikä" ;
та:та N_ӇЭ/Ё  "vaihto" ;
тю:тю N_ӇЭ-Pal/Var  "hiha" ;
хаби:хаби N_ӇЭ/ХАБИЕ  "hanti" ;
хани:хани N_ӇЭ  "poikanen" ;
электричество:электричество N_ӇЭ-RUS  "sähkö" ;
я:я N_Ё  "maa" ;
ӈавори:ӈавори N_ӇЭ  "tavara" ;
